Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-8,127
Land surveying; unlawful practice or use of title; penalty.

(1) Except as provided in sections 81-8,121.01 and 81-8,126, an individual shall not directly or indirectly engage in the practice of land surveying in the state or use the title professional land surveyor or display or use any words, letters, figures, titles, sign, card, advertisement, or other symbol or device indicating or tending to indicate that he or she is a professional land surveyor or is practicing land surveying unless he or she is licensed under the Land Surveyors Regulation Act. A licensee shall not aid or abet any person not licensed under the act in the practice of land surveying.

(2) Any person, firm, partnership, limited liability company, corporation, or joint-stock association who or which practices or offers to practice land surveying or uses the title of professional land surveyor or land surveyor, or any modification or derivative of such words, in its name or form of business activity in this state except as authorized in the Land Surveyors Regulation Act shall be deemed guilty of a Class I misdemeanor for the first offense and a Class IV felony for the second or any subsequent offense.

Laws 1957, c. 383, § 20, p. 1338;

Laws 1977, LB 39, § 297;

Laws 1993, LB 690, § 2;

Laws 1994, LB 884, § 93;

Laws 2015, LB138, § 17;

Laws 2024, LB102, § 45.